Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1470
Aircraft; implied consent of operator to submit to chemical test.

Any person who operates or has in his or her actual physical control an aircraft within this state shall be deemed to have given his or her consent to submit to a chemical test of his or her blood or breath, for the purpose of determining the amount of alcoholic content in his or her body fluid.

Laws 1978, LB 903, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 773, § 3.